Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3763.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3311.4, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 3311.4. A. Beginning January 1, 2008, and annually
thereafter, every active full-time peace officer, certified by the
Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training (CLEET) pursuant
to Section 3311 of this title, shall attend and complete a minimum
of twenty-five (25) hours of continuing law enforcement training
accredited or provided by CLEET which shall include a mandatory two
(2) hours on mental health issues and a mandatory two (2) hours on
HB3763 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

dome stic violence, intimate partner violence, and lethality
assessment protocol issues. Effective November 1, 2019, CLEET shall
establish appropriate training resources which shall include the
policies and protocols for responding to sexual assault calls,
guidelines for the collection and maintenance of sexual assault kits
and continuing education on trauma-informed sexual assault response
and intervention, and shall require all CLEET-certified law
enforcement officers to complete such training on a regular basis to
be determined by CLEET. CLEET shall promulgate rules to enforce the
provisions of this section and shall enter into contracts and
agreements for the payment of classroom space, training, food, and
lodging expenses as may be necessary for law enforcement officers
attending such training in accordance with subsection B of Section
3311 of this title. Such training and seminars shall be conducted
in all areas of this state at technology center schools,
institutions of higher education, or other approved sites.
B. Beginning January 1, 2017, and annually thereafter, every
active reserve peace officer, certified by CLEET pursuant to Section
3311 of this title, shall attend and complete a minimum of eight (8)
hours of continuing law enforcement training accredited or provided
by CLEET which shall include a mandatory one (1) hour on mental
health issues and a mandatory one (1) hour on domestic violence,
intimate partner violence, and lethality assessment protocol issues.

HB3763 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

C. Every inactive full-time or reserve peace officer, certified
by CLEET, shall be exempt from these requirements during the
inactive status. Upon reentry to full-time active status, the peace
officer shall be required to comply with subsection A of this
section. If a full-time certified peace officer has been inactive
for five (5) or more years, the officer must complete refresher
training as prescribed by CLEET and which shall include a minimum of
four (4) hours of mental health education and training, within one
(1) year of employment. Upon reentry to active reserve status, the
peace officer shall be required to comply with subsection B of this
section. If a certified reserve officer has been inactive for five
(5) or more years, the certified reserve officer shall complete a
legal update as prescribed by CLEET. The Director of CLEET may
waive these requirements based on review of all records of
employment and training.
D. Every tribal officer who is commissioned by an Oklahoma law
enforcement agency pursuant to a cross-deputization agreement with
the State of Oklahoma or any political subdivision of the State of
Oklahoma pursuant to the provisions of Section 1221 of Title 74 of
the Oklahoma Statutes shall comply with the provisions of this
section.
E. Any active full-time or reserve certified peace officer, or
CLEET-certified cross-deputized tribal officer who fails to meet the
annual training requirements specified in this section, shall be
HB3763 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

subj ect to having the certification of the peace officer suspended,
after the peace officer and the employer have been given written
notice of noncompliance and a reasonable time, as defined by the
Council, to comply with the provisions of this section. A peace
officer shall not be employed in the capacity of a peace officer
during any period of suspension. The suspension period shall be for
a period of time until the officer files a statement attesting to
full compliance with the provisions of this section. Suspension of
peace officer certification shall be reported to the district
attorney for the jurisdiction in which the officer is employed, the
liability insurance company of the law enforcement agency that
employed the peace officer, the chief elected official of the
governing body of the law enforcement agency and the chief law
enforcement officer of the law enforcement agency. Any officer
whose certification is suspended pursuant to this section may
request a hearing with CLEET. Such hearings shall be governed by
the Administrative Procedures Act except that the affected officer
has the burden to show CLEET why CLEET should not have the
certification of the officer suspended.
F. All certified, active full-time or reserve peace officers
employed, commissioned or appointed for a period of ninety (90) days
in a calendar year, who become inactive prior to the end of a
calendar year, are responsible for meeting mandatory continuing
education requirements as set forth in this section upon return to
HB3763 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

acti ve full-time or reserve peace officer status within sixty (60)
days of the date of return to employment, commission or appointment.
Failure to complete the mandatory continuing education within sixty
(60) days may result in disciplinary action as set forth in CLEET
Rules at OAC 390:2. Full-time or reserve certified peace officers
who return to active status within the calendar year they become
inactive must complete the annual mandatory continuing education
requirements outlined in this section within the remaining portion
of the calendar year.
G. Peace officers with full-time certification who worked
during a calendar year only as a reserve officer are required to
complete only the training requirements for reserve certification.
For purposes of the requirements outlined in subsection F of this
section, full-time peace officers who worked both in the capacity of
a full-time peace officer and reserve officer in a calendar year
must complete full-time continuing education requirements.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS AND BUDGET, dated
02/18/2026 - DO PASS, As Coauthored.





HB3763 HFLR Page 5
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.